Hawaii statutes.
§386-96 Reports of physicians, surgeons,
and hospitals. (a) Any physician, surgeon, or hospital that has given any
treatment or rendered any service to an injured employee shall make a report of
the injury and treatment on forms prescribed by and to be obtained from the
department as follows:

(1) Within seven days after the date of first
attendance or service rendered, an initial report shall be made to the
department and to the employer of the injured employee in the manner prescribed
by the department;

(2) Interim reports to the same parties and in the
same manner as prescribed in paragraph (1) shall be made at appropriate
intervals to verify the claimant's current diagnosis and prognosis, that the
information as to the nature of the examinations and treatments performed is
complete, including the dates of those treatments and the results obtained
within the current reporting period, the execution of all tests performed
within the current reporting period and the results of the tests, whether the
injured employee is improving, worsening, or if "medical
stabilization" has been reached, the dates of disability, any work
restrictions, and the return to work date. When an injured employee is
returned to full-time, regular, light, part-time, or restricted work, the
attending physician shall submit a report to the employer within seven calendar
days indicating the date of release to work or medical stabilization; and

(3) A final report to the same parties and in the
same manner as prescribed in paragraph (1) shall be made within seven days
after termination of treatment.

No physician, surgeon, or hospital that has given
any treatment or rendered any service to an injured employee shall be required
to provide any additional reports not otherwise mandated by this section.

(b) No claim under this chapter for medical
treatment, surgical treatment, or hospital services and supplies, shall be
valid and enforceable unless the reports are made as provided in this section,
except that the director may excuse the failure to make the report within the
prescribed period or a nonsubmission of the report when the director finds it
in the best interest of justice to do so. If the director does not excuse the
submission of:

(1) An initial or interim report within the time
prescribed in subsection (a)(1) and (2); or

(2) A final report that is thirty days late or a
nonsubmission,

the delinquent physician shall be fined not more
than $500.

(c) The director shall furnish to the injured
employee a copy of the final report of the attending physician or surgeon or,
if more than one physician or surgeon should treat or examine the employee, a
copy of the final report of each physician or surgeon.

(d) Within fifteen days after being requested
to do so by the injured employee or the employee's duly authorized
representative, the employer shall furnish the employee or the employee's duly
authorized representative with copies of all medical reports relating to the
employee's injury that are in the possession of the employer. The copies shall
be furnished at the expense of the employer. The employer shall allow the
employee or the employee's duly authorized representative to inspect and copy
transcripts of depositions of medical witnesses, relating to the employee's
injury, in the possession of the employer. Any employer who fails to furnish
medical reports or to allow inspection and copying of transcripts of
depositions of medical witnesses, as required by this subsection, shall be
fined in an amount not to exceed $5,000.

(e) Deposit of the records required by
subsection (a)(1) in the United States mail or by electronic means as approved
by the director, addressed to the director and to the employer, within the time
limit specified, shall be deemed in compliance with the requirements of this
section. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-111; am L 1966, c 7, §3; HRS
§386-96; am L 1969, c 31, §1; am L 1972, c 13, §1 and c 60, §1; am L 1973, c
12, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 37, §4; am L 1995, c 234, §15; am L Sp 2005,
c 11, §10; am L 2016, c 187, §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next